Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2723
Rights at death.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in sections 30-2716 to 30-2733, on death of a party sums on deposit in a multiple-party account belong to the surviving party or parties. If two or more parties survive and one is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under section 30-2722 belongs to the surviving spouse. If two or more parties survive and none is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under such section belongs to the surviving parties in equal shares, and augments the proportion to which each survivor, immediately before the decedent's death, was beneficially entitled under section 30-2722, and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

(b) In an account with a POD designation:

(1) On death of one of two or more parties, the rights in sums on deposit are governed by subsection (a) of this section.

(2)(A) On death of the sole party or the last survivor of two or more parties, sums on deposit belong to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries. If two or more beneficiaries survive, sums on deposit belong to them in such proportions as specified in the POD designation or, if the POD designation does not specify different proportions, in equal and undivided shares, and there is no right of survivorship in the event of death of a beneficiary thereafter. If no beneficiary survives, sums on deposit belong to the estate of the last surviving party.

(B) Except as otherwise specified in the POD designation, if there are two or more beneficiaries, and if any beneficiary fails to survive the sole party or the last survivor of two or more parties, sums on deposit belong to the surviving beneficiaries in proportion to their respective interests as beneficiaries under subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection.

(c) Sums on deposit in a single-party account without a POD designation, or in a multiple-party account that, by the terms of the account, is without right of survivorship, are not affected by death of a party, but the amount to which the decedent, immediately before death, was beneficially entitled under section 30-2722 is transferred as part of the decedent's estate. A POD designation in a multiple-party account without right of survivorship is ineffective. For purposes of this section, designation of an account as a tenancy in common establishes that the account is without right of survivorship.

(d) The ownership right of a surviving party or beneficiary, or of the decedent's estate, in sums on deposit is subject to requests for payment made by a party before the party's death, whether paid by the financial institution before or after death, or unpaid. The surviving party or beneficiary, or the decedent's estate, is liable to the payee of an unpaid request for payment. The liability is limited to a proportionate share of the amount transferred under this section, to the extent necessary to discharge the request for payment.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB55, § 3.

Under subsection (b)(2) of this section, a payable-on-death beneficiary may be named in either an individual or a representative capacity. In re Trust of Rosenberg, 273 Neb. 59, 727 N.W.2d 430 (2007).

Pursuant to subsection (d), unpaid checks written on a party's account before the party's death must be paid by the beneficiary of the sums on deposit in the decedent's account. In re Estate of Lamplaugh, 270 Neb. 941, 708 N.W.2d 645 (2005).

To establish a valid joint account, it is not necessary the beneficiary or donee have knowledge of its creation, sign signature cards, or deposit or withdraw funds to the account. The intent of the depositor is the significant consideration in determining the effect of a joint account. In re Estate of Lienemann, 222 Neb. 169, 382 N.W.2d 595 (1986).